New York, session 2025-2026, S5253.
do enact as follows: 1 Section 1. Section 2.10 of the criminal procedure law is amended by 2 adding a new subdivision 88 to read as follows: 3 88. Fire marshals employed in the Long Island Rail Road Company Office 4 of the Fire Marshals, when acting pursuant to their special duties in 5 matters arising under the laws relating to fires, the extinguishment 6 thereof and fire perils; provided, however, that nothing in this subdi- 7 vision shall be deemed to authorize such officer to carry, possess, 8 repair or dispose of a firearm unless the appropriate license therefor 9 has been issued pursuant to section 400.00 of the penal law. 10 § 2. This act shall take effect immediately. EXPLANATION--Matter in italics (underscored) is new; matter in brackets [ ] is old law to be omitted. LBD00978-01-5